dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="b/y__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>udte</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udte</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udt</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>udt</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydde</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydde</l>      <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydd</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydd</l>       <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yende</l>     <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bortkom/men__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ment</l>      <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>met</l>       <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>men<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lei/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ete</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gys/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>se</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="søk/ke__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ken</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ket</l>       <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skulle__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>nde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="avkle__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dende</l>     <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tr/effe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>effende</l>   <r>effe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uffen</l>     <r>effe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uffet</l>     <r>effe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uffet</l>     <r>effe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ufne</l>      <r>effe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ufne</l>      <r>effe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/mange__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>fler</l>      <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>flere</l>     <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fleste</l>    <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>flest</l>     <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mange</l>     <r>mange<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="overskr/ide__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>edet</l>      <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edet</l>      <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edne</l>      <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edne</l>      <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idende</l>    <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>       <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="falby">           <i>falb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forby">           <i>forb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="framby">          <i>framb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gyse">            <i>gys</i><par n="gys/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="by">              <i>b</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avkle">           <i>avkle</i><par n="avkle__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fremby">          <i>fremb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bortkommen">      <i>bortkom</i><par n="bortkom/men__adj"/></e>
<e lm="betreffe">        <i>betr</i><par n="tr/effe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="breie">           <i>brei</i><par n="lei/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilby">           <i>tilb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skulle">          <i>skulle</i><par n="skulle__adj"/></e>
<e lm="støkke">          <i>støk</i><par n="søk/ke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utby">            <i>utb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="underskride">     <i>underskr</i><par n="overskr/ide__adj"/></e>
<e lm="søkke">           <i>søk</i><par n="søk/ke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sneie">           <i>snei</i><par n="lei/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="villeie">         <i>villei</i><par n="lei/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vill-leie">       <i>vill-lei</i><par n="lei/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="treffe">          <i>tr</i><par n="tr/effe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ugreie">          <i>ugrei</i><par n="lei/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="totalforby">      <i>totalforb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="underby">         <i>underb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="leie">            <i>lei</i><par n="lei/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overskride">      <i>overskr</i><par n="overskr/ide__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppby">           <i>oppb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overtreffe">      <i>overtr</i><par n="tr/effe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="innby">           <i>innb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påby">            <i>påb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inntreffe">       <i>inntr</i><par n="tr/effe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overby">          <i>overb</i><par n="b/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="påtreffe">        <i>påtr</i><par n="tr/effe__adj"/></e>
